Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1805
Real property taxes; affidavits of publication; by whom made.

Every printer who shall publish such list and notice shall, immediately after the last publication thereof, furnish to the treasurer of the proper county an affidavit of publication made by the publisher, manager or foreman of such newspaper to whom the facts of publication are known. No printer shall be paid for such publication who shall fail to furnish such affidavit within ten days after the last publication. The county treasurer shall also make, or cause to be made, an affidavit or affidavits of the publication of such list and notice as above required, all of which shall be carefully preserved by him in his office.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 197, p. 460;

R.S.1913, § 6525;

C.S.1922, § 6053;

C.S.1929, § 77-2005;

R.S.1943, § 77-1805.

Affidavit of publication of tax list sworn to before a United States Commissioner was void. Cornell v. Maverick Loan & Trust Co., 95 Neb. 9, 144 N.W. 1072 (1914).

Affidavit subscribed and sworn to before a person not authorized by law to administer oaths is void and no affidavit. Lanning v. Haases, 89 Neb. 19, 130 N.W. 1008 (1911).